Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-544
State Fire Marshal; certifications and reports to the United States Secretary of Transportation.

The State Fire Marshal is authorized to make such certifications and reports to the United States Secretary of Transportation as may be required from time to time under the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968 of the United States.

Laws 1969, c. 763, § 3, p. 2887.